District of Columbia statutes.
4-219.01

Authorization.

(a)

The Mayor shall include in his or her annual estimates of appropriations such sums as may be needed to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Unobligated balances of appropriations for the Department of Human Services, established by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, are made available for the purposes of this chapter.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1901, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-219.1.